District of Columbia statutes.
47-2417

Effective date.

The provisions of this chapter shall take effect on April 9, 1982.

History

Mar. 10, 1982, D.C. Law 4-71, § 4(b), 28 DCR 5243
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2417.